apertium-nya.nya.lexc
LEXICON Adjective-Var-Suffix
!%[%+sg%]%<adj%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
!%[%+pl%]%<adj%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl1%]%[%+sg%]%<adj%>%<sg%>%<cl1%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl1%]%[%+pl%]%<adj%>%<pl%>%<cl1%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl1a%]%[%+sg%]%<adj%>%<sg%>%<cl1a%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl1a%]%[%+pl%]%<adj%>%<pl%>%<cl1a%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl3%]%[%+sg%]%<adj%>%<sg%>%<cl3%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl3%]%[%+pl%]%<adj%>%<pl%>%<cl3%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl5%]%[%+sg%]%<adj%>%<sg%>%<cl5%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl5%]%[%+pl%]%<adj%>%<pl%>%<cl5%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl7%]%[%+sg%]%<adj%>%<sg%>%<cl7%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl7%]%[%+pl%]%<adj%>%<pl%>%<cl7%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl9%]%[%+sg%]%<adj%>%<sg%>%<cl9%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl9%]%[%+pl%]%<adj%>%<pl%>%<cl9%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl9a%]%[%+sg%]%<adj%>%<sg%>%<cl9a%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl9a%]%[%+pl%]%<adj%>%<pl%>%<cl9a%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl12%]%[%+sg%]%<adj%>%<sg%>%<cl12%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl12%]%[%+pl%]%<adj%>%<pl%>%<cl12%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl14%]%[%+sg%]%<adj%>%<sg%>%<cl14%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl14%]%[%+pl%]%<adj%>%<pl%>%<cl14%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl15%]%<adj%>%<cl15%>: COMMON-Suffix ;	! Consider CG rule for cl15 adj followed by vblex inf
%[%+cl16%]%<adj%>%<cl16%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl17%]%<adj%>%<cl17%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl18%]%<adj%>%<cl18%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

!=============================================================================!
!                         Pronoun Morphotactics                               !
!=============================================================================!
LEXICON PRON-1sg
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-2sg
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

!LEXICON PRON-3sg
!%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-1pl
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-2pl
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

!LEXICON PRON-3pl
!%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-cl1
%<prn%>%<nom%>%<cl1%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-cl2
%<prn%>%<nom%>%<cl2%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-cl3
%<prn%>%<nom%>%<cl3%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-cl4
%<prn%>%<nom%>%<cl4%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-cl5
%<prn%>%<nom%>%<cl5%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-cl6
%<prn%>%<nom%>%<cl6%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-cl7
%<prn%>%<nom%>%<cl7%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-cl8
%<prn%>%<nom%>%<cl8%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-cl9
%<prn%>%<nom%>%<cl9%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-cl10
%<prn%>%<nom%>%<cl10%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-cl12
%<prn%>%<nom%>%<cl12%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-cl13
%<prn%>%<nom%>%<cl13%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-cl14
%<prn%>%<nom%>%<cl14%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-cl15
%<prn%>%<nom%>%<cl15%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-cl16
%<prn%>%<nom%>%<cl16%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-cl17
%<prn%>%<nom%>%<cl17%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

LEXICON PRON-cl18
%<prn%>%<nom%>%<cl18%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

!=============================================================================!
!                         Verb Morphotactics                                  !
!=============================================================================!
LEXICON VerbPersonNum-Prefix
%[%-p1%]%[%-sg%]:ndi%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-p2%]%[%-sg%]:u%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-p3%]%[%-sg%]:a%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-p1%]%[%-pl%]:ti%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-p2%]%[%-pl%]:mu%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-p3%]%[%-pl%]:a%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-cl1%]%[%-sg%]:a%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-cl1%]%[%-pl%]:a%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-cl1a%]%[%-sg%]:a%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-cl1a%]%[%-pl%]:a%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-cl3%]%[%-sg%]:u%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-cl3%]%[%-pl%]:i%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-cl5%]%[%-sg%]:li%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-cl5%]%[%-pl%]:a%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-cl7%]%[%-sg%]:ci%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-cl7%]%[%-pl%]:zi%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-cl9%]%[%-sg%]:i%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-cl9%]%[%-pl%]:zi%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-cl9a%]%[%-sg%]:i%> VerbFutRefOrStem ; ! Class 9-6
%[%-cl9a%]%[%-pl%]:a%> VerbFutRefOrStem ; ! Class 9-6
%[%-cl12%]%[%-sg%]:ka%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-cl12%]%[%-pl%]:ti%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-cl14%]%[%-sg%]:u%> VerbFutRefOrStem ; ! Class 14-6
%[%-cl14%]%[%-pl%]:a%> VerbFutRefOrStem ; ! Class 14-6
%[%-cl15%]:ku%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-cl16%]:pa%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-cl17%]:ku%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;
%[%-cl18%]:mu%> VerbFutRefOrStem ;

%[%-inf%]:ku%> Verb-Stems ; ! Infinitive form goes straight to stems
! [inf] is not helpful when the resulting noun is followed by an adjective e.g. kupanga kwabwino
%[%-imp%]:%> Verb-Stems ; ! Imperative goes straight to stems. As does the focus particle "ndi"

LEXICON VerbFutRefOrStem
Verb-Stems ;
%[%-pres%]:ku Verb-Stems ;

LEXICON Verb-Suffix
%<vblex%>:%> Verb-TAM-Suffix ;

LEXICON Verb-TAM-Suffix
Verb-Present-Suffix ;
Verb-InfImp-Suffix ;

LEXICON Verb-InfImp-Suffix
%[%+inf%]%<inf%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+imp%]%<imp%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Imperative (and the focus particle!?)

LEXICON Verb-Present-Suffix
%[%+p1%]%[%+sg%]%<p1%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p2%]%[%+sg%]%<p2%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p3%]%[%+sg%]%[%+pres%]%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p1%]%[%+pl%]%<p1%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p2%]%[%+pl%]%<p2%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+p3%]%[%+pl%]%[%+pres%]%<pres%>%<p3%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl1%]%[%+sg%]%<cl1%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl1%]%[%+pl%]%<cl1%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl1a%]%[%+sg%]%<cla%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl1a%]%[%+pl%]%<cl1a%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl3%]%[%+sg%]%<cl3%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl3%]%[%+pl%]%<cl3%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl5%]%[%+sg%]%<cl5%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl5%]%[%+pl%]%<cl5%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl7%]%[%+sg%]%<cl7%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl7%]%[%+pl%]%<cl7%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl9%]%[%+sg%]%<cl9%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl9%]%[%+pl%]%<cl9%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl9a%]%[%+sg%]%<cl9a%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Class 9-6
%[%+cl9a%]%[%+pl%]%<cl9a%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Class 9-6
%[%+cl12%]%[%+sg%]%<cl12%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl12%]%[%+pl%]%<cl12%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl14%]%[%+sg%]%<cl14%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Class 14-6
%[%+cl14%]%[%+pl%]%<cl14%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Class 14-6
%[%+cl15%]%<cl15%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl16%]%<cl16%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl17%]%<cl17%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+cl18%]%<cl18%>: COMMON-Suffix ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!=============================================================================!
!                               Nouns                                         !
!=============================================================================!

LEXICON I-II-Stems
munthu:%{U%}nthu I-II-Suffix ; ! "Person"
mkazi:kazi I-II-Suffix ; ! "Woman, wife"
mwamuna:%{W%}%{A%}muna I-II-Suffix ; ! "Man, husband"
mwana:%{W%}%{A%}na I-II-Suffix ; ! "Child"
mnzanga:nzanga I-II-Suffix ; ! "(My) Friend" Paas: mnza- followed by possessive suffix
mnzako:nzako I-II-Suffix ; ! "(Your) Friend"
mnzake:nzake I-II-Suffix ; ! "(His/ Her/ Their) Friend"

LEXICON Ia-II-Stems
mayi:mayi Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Mother"
bambo:bambo Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Father"
tate:tate Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Father"
galu:galu Ia-II-Suffix ; ! "Dog"

LEXICON Verb-Stems
wona:wona Verb-Suffix ; ! "To see"
panga:panga Verb-Suffix ; ! "To do"
kozala:zal Verb-Suffix ; ! Copula, must also analyze as aux verb
bzala:bzala Verb-Suffix ; ! "To sow, plant"
limba:limba Verb-Suffix ; ! "To be hard"
mwa:mwa Verb-Suffix ; ! "To drink"
dya:dya Verb-Suffix ; ! "To eat"
luma:luma Verb-Suffix ; ! "To bite"
yamwa:yamwa Verb-Suffix ; ! "To suck"
ocha:ocha Verb-Suffix ; ! "To burn" Active
psa:psa Verb-Suffix ; ! "To burn" Passive
lavula:lavula Verb-Suffix ; ! "To spit"
sanza:sanza Verb-Suffix ; ! "To vomit"
omba:omba Verb-Suffix ; ! "To blow"
puma:puma Verb-Suffix ; ! "To breathe"
seka:seka Verb-Suffix ; ! "To laugh"
ona:ona Verb-Suffix ; ! "To see"
yang'ana:yang'ana Verb-Suffix ; ! "To see"
mva:mva Verb-Suffix ; ! "To hear"
dziwa:dziwa Verb-Suffix ; ! "To know"
ganiza:ganiza Verb-Suffix ; ! "To think"
nunkha:nunkha Verb-Suffix ; ! "To smell" Both Active and Passive
opa:opa Verb-Suffix ; ! "To fear"
gona:gona Verb-Suffix ; ! "To sleep"
khala:khala Verb-Suffix ; ! "To live"
fa:fa Verb-Suffix ; ! "To die"
mwalira:mwalira Verb-Suffix ; ! "To die"
pha:pha Verb-Suffix ; ! "To kill"
menyana:menyana Verb-Suffix ; ! "To fight"
saka:saka Verb-Suffix ; ! "To hunt"
menya:menya Verb-Suffix ; ! "To hit"
dula:dula Verb-Suffix ; ! "To cut"
gawa:gawa Verb-Suffix ; ! "To split"
baya:baya Verb-Suffix ; ! "To stab"
kanda:kanda Verb-Suffix ; ! "To scratch"
kumba:kumba Verb-Suffix ; ! "To dig"
sambila:sambila Verb-Suffix ; ! "To swim"
uluka:uluka Verb-Suffix ; ! "To fly"
yenda:yenda Verb-Suffix ; ! "To walk"
bwera:bwera Verb-Suffix ; ! "To come"
gona:gona Verb-Suffix ; ! "To lie (bed)"
khala:khala Verb-Suffix ; ! "To sit"
ima:ima Verb-Suffix ; ! "To stand"
khota:khota Verb-Suffix ; ! "To turn"
gwa:gwa Verb-Suffix ; ! "To fall"
patsa:patsa Verb-Suffix ; ! "To give"
gwira:gwira Verb-Suffix ; ! "To hold"
finya:finya Verb-Suffix ; ! "To squeeze"
sisita:sisita Verb-Suffix ; ! "To rub"
capa:capa Verb-Suffix ; ! "To wash" Active
samba:samba Verb-Suffix ; ! "To wash/ bathe" Passive
pukuta:pukuta Verb-Suffix ; ! "To wipe"
koka:koka Verb-Suffix ; ! "To pull"
kankha:kankha Verb-Suffix ; ! "To push"
ponya:ponya Verb-Suffix ; ! "To throw"
manga:manga Verb-Suffix ; ! "To tie"
soka:soka Verb-Suffix ; ! "To sew"
werenga:werenga Verb-Suffix ; ! "To count"
nena:nena Verb-Suffix ; ! "To say"
imba:imba Verb-Suffix ; ! "To sing"
sewera:sewera Verb-Suffix ; ! "To play"
yandama:yandama Verb-Suffix ; ! "To float"
ukha:ukha Verb-Suffix ; ! "To flow"
uma:uma Verb-Suffix ; ! "To freeze"
tupa:tupa Verb-Suffix ; ! "To swell"
fufuma:fufuma Verb-Suffix ; ! "To swell"
ndi:ndi Verb-Suffix ; ! The verb "To be" can also be expressed using the focus particle
li:li Verb-Suffix ; ! The deficient verb "To be" has no TAM
ti:ti Verb-Suffix ; ! The deficient verb "To say" has no TAM
